Utah statutes.
53A-11-103.   Duties of a school board, local charter board, or school
district in resolving attendance problems -- Parental involvement -- Liability
not imposed.
(1)  A local school board, local charter board, or school district shall make
efforts to resolve the school attendance problems of each school-age minor who
is, or should be, enrolled in the school district.
(2)  The efforts described in Subsection (1) shall include, as reasonably
feasible:
(a)  counseling of the minor by school authorities;
(b)  issuing a notice of truancy to a school-age minor who is at least 12
years old, in accordance with Section 53A-11-101.7;
(c)  issuing a notice of compulsory education violation to a parent of a
school-age child, in accordance with Section 53A-11-101.5;
(d)  making any necessary adjustment to the curriculum and schedule to meet
special needs of the minor;
(e)  considering alternatives proposed by a parent;
(f)  monitoring school attendance of the minor;
(g)  voluntary participation in truancy mediation, if available; and
(h)  providing a school-age minor's parent, upon request, with a list of
resources available to assist the parent in resolving the school-age minor's
attendance problems.
(3)  In addition to the efforts described in Subsection (2), the local school
board, local charter board, or school district may enlist the assistance of
community and law enforcement agencies as appropriate and reasonably feasible.
(4)  This section shall not impose any civil liability on boards of education,
local school boards, local charter boards, school districts, or their
employees.
(5)  Proceedings initiated under this part do not obligate or preclude action
by the Division of Child and Family Services under Section 78A-6-319.
